Maine, session 132, LD480.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3174-PPP is enacted to read:
§3174-PPP. Reimbursement for certain weight loss medications
The department shall provide reimbursement under the MaineCare program for
glucagon-like peptide-1 receptor agonists that are approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration for the treatment of obesity. The department shall restrict reimbursement
under the MaineCare program of glucagon-like peptide-1 receptor agonists to medications
prescribed by a primary care provider or a bariatric specialist and shall require a prior
authorization of the medication.